Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-421
Act, how cited.

Sections 29-416 to 29-421 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Act on Fresh Pursuit.

Laws 1937, c. 70, § 8, p. 257;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 29-423;

R.S.1943, § 29-421;

Laws 2001, LB 299, § 4.